Georgia, session 2025_26, HB398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
10 SECTION 1.
11 Chapter 2 of Title 26 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to standards,
12 labeling, and adulteration of food, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
H. B. 398
- 1 -

25 LC 44 2976/AP
13 "ARTICLE 19
14 26-2-470.
15 As used in this article, the term:
16 (1) 'Commissioner' means the Commissioner of Agriculture.
17 (2) 'Cottage food item' means a non-potentially hazardous food or nonalcoholic beverage
18 intended for human consumption that is produced and, if packaged, packaged at the
19 residential property of the producer. The term 'cottage food item' shall not include
20 alcoholic beverages, foods containing cannabis, or raw milk.
21 (3) 'Cottage food operator' means a person who produces cottage food items at a
22 residential property for sale to consumers or sellers pursuant to this article.
23 (4) 'Cottage food production operation' means an individual, operating out of the
24 individual's home kitchen, who prepares, processes, packages, stores, and distributes
25 non-potentially hazardous foods for sale directly to a person, including online and by mail
26 order, or to any food sales establishment, as that term is defined in Code Section 26-2-21.
27 (5) 'Department' means the Department of Agriculture of this state.
28 (6) 'Home kitchen' means a kitchen primarily intended for use by the residents of a home.
29 (7) 'Non-potentially hazardous foods' means cottage food items that do not require
30 temperature control for safety because they are not capable of supporting the rapid
31 growth of pathogenic or toxigenic microorganisms or the growth and toxin production
32 of Clostridium botulinum. The term 'non-potentially hazardous foods' includes, but is not
33 limited to, baked goods such as loaf breads, rolls, biscuits and cakes, except those whose
34 fillings require refrigeration or have high moisture content; jams, jellies, and preserves,
35 except fruit butters when their commercial sterility may be affected by reduced sugar or
36 pectin levels; uncut fruits and vegetables; dried fruits; dry herbs, seasonings, and
37 mixtures; cereals, trail mixes, and granola; coated and uncoated nuts; vinegars and
H. B. 398
- 2 -

25 LC 44 2976/AP
38 flavored vinegars; dill pickles; confections; fudge; dry soup mixes; roasted coffee beans;
39 dry pasta; and popcorn, popcorn balls, and cotton candy.
40 (8) 'Potentially hazardous foods' means cottage food items requiring temperature control
41 for safety because they are capable of supporting the rapid growth of pathogenic or
42 toxigenic microorganisms or the growth and toxin production of Clostridium botulinum.
43 (9) 'Produce' means to prepare a food item by cooking, baking, drying, mixing, cutting,
44 dehydrating, growing, raising, or other process.
45 (10) 'Producer' means a person who produces a cottage food item pursuant to this article.
46 (11) 'Seller' means any person, except a cottage food operator, who sells a cottage food
47 item to a consumer, including, but not limited to, an agent of the producer or a third-party
48 vendor.
49 (12) 'Third-party vendor' means a retail store, grocery store, restaurant, or other similar
50 store.
51 26-2-471.
52 (a) It shall be unlawful for any person to operate as a cottage food operator not in
53 compliance with this article.
54 (b) This article shall not apply to a person who sells non-potentially hazardous foods at a
55 bake sale affiliated with a nonprofit, charitable, or religious organization.
56 26-2-472.
57 Cottage food production operations may only sell, or offer to sell, food items directly to a
58 person, including online and by mail order, or to retail food sales establishments, including
59 grocery stores and restaurants. Food produced from a cottage food production operation,
60 and in compliance with the requirements of this article, shall be considered to be from an
61 approved source, as required of a retail food sales establishment pursuant to department
62 regulations. Any retail food sales establishment, including any grocery store, that sells or
H. B. 398
- 3 -

25 LC 44 2976/AP
63 offers to sell cottage food products must post signage according to specifications as
64 promulgated by the department indicating that cottage food products are not subject to
65 commercial food regulations or inspection.
66 26-2-473.
67 (a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, a cottage food operator or
68 seller shall provide the following information to consumers of a cottage food item:
69 (1)(A) The business name, address, and telephone number of the cottage food operator;
70 or
71 (B) A cottage food operator or seller may elect, in lieu of providing an address
72 pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, to provide an identification number to
73 be provided by the department upon written request; and
74 (2) The following statement in at least 10 point font: 'This product was produced at a
75 residential property that is exempt from state inspection. This product may contain
76 allergens.'
77 (b) Such information shall be provided:
78 (1) On a label affixed to the package, if the cottage food item is packaged;
79 (2) On a label affixed to the container, if the cottage food item is offered for sale from
80 a bulk container;
81 (3) On a placard displayed at the point of sale, if the cottage food item is neither
82 packaged nor offered for sale from a bulk container; or
83 (4) On the webpage on which the cottage food item is offered for sale, if the cottage food
84 item is offered for sale on the internet.
85 (c)(1) If the cottage food item is sold by telephone or custom order, the seller may
86 choose not to display the information required by subsection (a) of this Code section but
87 shall disclose to consumers that the cottage food item:
88 (A) Is produced at a residential property that is exempt from state inspection; and
H. B. 398
- 4 -

25 LC 44 2976/AP
89 (B) May contain allergens.
90 (2) The seller shall have the information required by paragraphs (1) through (3) of
91 subsection (a) of this Code section readily available and shall provide it to consumers
92 upon request.
93 (d) In addition to the labeling requirements provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this
94 Code section, if the cottage food item is sold by a third-party vendor, the item shall be
95 displayed in a separate section of the store or in a separate display case from non-cottage
96 food items. The third-party vendor shall conspicuously label the separate section or display
97 case as containing cottage food items that are exempt from state inspection.
98 26-2-474.
99 The Commissioner shall be authorized to enforce the provisions of this article and shall
100 have the authority to adopt any rules or regulations necessary to carry out said enforcement.
101 Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the department from conducting an
102 investigation into a reported foodborne illness.
103 26-2-475.
104 Any person who willfully fails to comply with any provision of this article or violates any
105 rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article shall be given a written warning. Upon
106 a second or subsequent violation, such person shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more
107 than $75.00 per violation.
108 26-2-476.
109 (a) The department may inspect the residence of a cottage food operator to investigate a
110 consumer complaint, a report of foodborne illness, or other public health emergency.
111 (b) Such inspection shall be limited to the areas of the residence used by the cottage food
112 operator.
H. B. 398
- 5 -

25 LC 44 2976/AP
113 (c) Except in emergency situations, the department shall schedule an inspection with the
114 cottage food operator in advance. A cottage food operator may request an administrative
115 warrant prior to an inspection.
116 26-2-477.
117 Nothing in this article shall be construed to:
118 (1) Exempt a cottage food operator or seller from any applicable federal law, including,
119 but not limited to, any federal law prohibiting the sale of certain food items in interstate
120 commerce;
121 (2) Preclude the production or sale of food items otherwise allowed by federal, state, or
122 local law;
123 (3) Preclude the sale of live animals or portions of live animals before slaughter for
124 future delivery;
125 (4) Amend or otherwise alter any rule or regulation related to other goods and services
126 provided where cottage food items are produced or sold;
127 (5) Exempt a cottage food operator or seller from any applicable tax law;
128 (6) Exempt a cottage food operator or seller from any applicable fishing or hunting law;
129 or
130 (7) Exempt a cottage food operator or seller from any applicable law of another state.
131 26-2-478.
132 (a) In addition to the regulation of cottage food items under this article by the department
133 and the Commissioner, the governing authority of any county or municipality may elect to
134 prohibit cottage food operators from selling cottage food items through third-party vendors
135 within its jurisdiction through the adoption of an ordinance providing as much. Any such
136 ordinance shall only be adopted at a hearing occurring at least 15 but not more than 45 days
137 after a notice of the hearing is published within a newspaper of general circulation within
H. B. 398
- 6 -

25 LC 44 2976/AP
138 the territorial boundaries of the local government. Any such county or municipality may
139 employ its local board of health to assist in such matters.
140 (b) No ordinance authorized under subsection (a) of this Code section shall become
141 effective until the county or municipality notifies the Commissioner and the department of
142 such ordinance prior to the effective date of the required ordinance.
143 (c) Neither the Commissioner, nor the department, shall be responsible or liable for any
144 prohibition or regulation enacted by ordinance pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code
145 section."
146 SECTION 2.
147 Said chapter is further amended in Article 2, relating to adulteration and misbranding of food,
148 by revising paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 26-2-21, relating to definitions,
149 as follows:
150 "(5) 'Food sales establishment' means retail and wholesale grocery stores; retail seafood
151 stores and places of business; food processing plants, except those food processing plants
152 which are currently required to obtain a license from the Commissioner under any other
153 provision of law; bakeries; confectioneries; fruit, nuts, and vegetable stores or roadside
154 stands; wholesale sandwich and salad manufacturers, including vending machines and
155 operations connected therewith; and places of business and similar establishments,
156 mobile or permanent, engaged in the sale of food primarily for consumption off the
157 premises. Within a food sales establishment, there may be a food service component, not
158 separately operated, which may serve customers on site. This food service component
159 shall be considered as part of the food sales establishment. Such term shall not include:
160 (A) The food sales component of any food service establishment defined in Code
161 Section 26-2-370;
162 (B) Food service establishments as defined in Code Section 26-2-370;
H. B. 398
- 7 -

25 LC 44 2976/AP
163 (C) Establishments engaged in the sale of food primarily for consumption off the
164 premises if such sale is an authorized part of and occurs upon the site of a fair or
165 festival which:
166 (i) Is sponsored by a political subdivision of this state; and
167 (ii) Lasts 120 hours or less;
168 (D) Establishments engaged in the boiling, bottling, and sale of sugar cane syrup or
169 sorghum syrup within this state, provided that such bottles contain a label listing the
170 producer's name and street address, all added ingredients, and the net weight or volume
171 of the product; or
172 (E) Nonprofit food sales and food service provided under a permit issued pursuant to
173 Article 14 of this chapter;
174 (F) Cottage food operators as provided for in Code Section 26-2-471; or
175 (G) A person selling non-potentially hazardous foods, as defined in Code
176 Section 26-2-470, at a bake sale affiliated with a nonprofit, charitable, or religious
177 organization."
178 SECTION 3.
179 Said chapter is further amended in Article 6, relating to meat, poultry, and dairy processing
180 plants, by revising paragraph (3) of Code Section 26-2-200, relating to definitions, as
181 follows:
182 "(3) 'Meat, poultry, or dairy processing plant' means: any abattoir, slaughterhouse,
183 poultry killing or processing plant, milk depot, milk processing plant, or any other
184 establishment for the killing, storage, dressing, manufacture, preparation, or processing
185 of any animal, fowl, or dairy product or any by-product thereof for human consumption.
186 Such term shall not include cottage food operators as provided for in Code
187 Section 26-2-471."
H. B. 398
- 8 -

25 LC 44 2976/AP
188 SECTION 4.
189 Said chapter is further amended in Article 13, relating to food service establishments, by
190 revising paragraph (2) of Code Section 26-2-370, relating to definitions, as follows:
191 "(2) 'Food service establishment' means establishments for the preparation and serving
192 of meals, lunches, short orders, sandwiches, frozen desserts, or other edible products
193 either for carry out or service within the establishment. Such term includes restaurants;
194 coffee shops; cafeterias; short order cafes; luncheonettes; taverns; lunchrooms; places
195 which retail sandwiches or salads; soda fountains; institutions, both public and private;
196 mobile food service establishments; industrial cafeterias; catering establishments; and
197 similar facilities by whatever name called. Within a food service establishment, there
198 may be a food sales component, not separately operated. This food sales component shall
199 be considered as part of the food service establishment. Such term shall not include:
200 (A) A food sales establishment, as defined in Code Section 26-2-21, except as
201 otherwise stated in this paragraph;
202 (B) The food service component of any food sales establishment defined in Code
203 Section 26-2-21;
204 (C) Any outdoor recreation activity sponsored by the state, a county, a municipality,
205 or any department or entity thereof, any outdoor or indoor (other than school cafeteria
206 food service) public school function, or any outdoor private school function;
207 (D) Any organization which is operating on its own property or on the property of a
208 party that has provided written consent for the use of such property for such purpose
209 and which is exempt from taxes under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code
210 Section 48-7-25 or under Section 501(d) or paragraphs (1) through (8) or
211 paragraph (10) of Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code for the purpose of
212 operating a house or other residential structures where seriously ill or injured children
213 and their families are provided temporary accommodations in proximity to their
H. B. 398
- 9 -

25 LC 44 2976/AP
214 treatment hospitals and where food is prepared, served, transported, or stored by
215 volunteer personnel;
216 (E) Establishments for the preparation and serving of meals, lunches, short orders,
217 sandwiches, frozen desserts, or other edible products if such preparation or serving is
218 an authorized part of and occurs upon the site of an event which:
219 (i) Is sponsored by a political subdivision of this state;
220 (ii) Is held on the property of such sponsor or on the property of a party that has
221 provided written consent for use of such property for such event; and
222 (iii) Lasts 120 hours or less; or
223 (F) Nonprofit food sales and food service provided under a permit issued pursuant to
224 Article 14 of this chapter; or
225 (G) Cottage food operators as provided for in Code Section 26-2-471."
226 SECTION 5.
227 Chapter 60 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
228 provisions applicable to counties and municipal corporations, is amended by adding a new
229 Code section to read as follows:
230 "36-60-33.
231 Except as authorized under and in accordance with Code Section 26-2-478, no county or
232 municipality shall prohibit or regulate cottage food items as such term defined in Code
233 Section 26-2-470. No county or municipality shall prohibit commercial delivery
234 companies from delivering cottage food items."
235 SECTION 6.
236 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 398
- 10 -